District of Columbia statutes.
28:4-502

Presentment of “on arrival” drafts.

If a draft or the relevant instructions require presentment “on arrival”, “when goods arrive”, or the like, the collecting bank need not present until in its judgment a reasonable time for arrival of the goods has expired. Refusal to pay or accept because the goods have not arrived is not dishonor; the bank must notify its transferor of the refusal but need not present the draft again until it is instructed to do so or it learns of the arrival of the goods.

Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 707, Pub. L. 88-243, § 1
Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-249, § 2(e), 42 DCR 467

The section is designed to establish a definite rule for “on arrival” drafts. The term includes not only drafts drawn payable “on arrival” but also drafts forwarded with instructions to present “on arrival.” The term refers to the arrival of the relevant goods. Unless a bank has actual knowledge of the arrival of the goods, as for example, when it is the “notify” party on the bill of lading, the section only requires the exercise of such judgment in estimating time as a bank may be expected to have. Commonly the buyer-drawee will want the goods and will therefore call for the documents and take up the draft when they do arrive.

Reason for 1990 Change [D.C. Law 10-249]

Modified to conform with current drafting practices; no intent to change substance.

1973 Ed., § 28:4-502.
1981 Ed., § 28:4-502.